District of Columbia statutes.
10-1336

Sunset provision.

If the Foundation has returned monies deposited in the Fund pursuant to § 10-1333(h), the Foundation shall cease all operations.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-180, § 7, 43 DCR 4246
1981 Ed., § 9-736.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-1331.